Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
PART 10 Employees of Certain State Authorities and Commissions
47-2-322.
Membership in retirement system of officers and employees of Georgia Music Hall of Fame Authority; creditable service; contributions.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Georgia Music Hall of Fame Authority” or “authority” means the Georgia Music Hall of Fame Authority established by Part 10 of Article 7 of Chapter 3 of Title 12.

“Officer or employee” means the executive director of the authority and any other full-time employee of the authority employed pursuant to the provisions of paragraph (3) of Code Section 12-3-524.

“Proof of prior employment” means pay records, income tax withholding records, or other records of the authority which are sufficient to establish to the satisfaction of the board of trustees the prior employment record of an officer or employee of the authority.

Effective July 1, 1994, or on the date of employment, each officer or employee of the authority shall become a member of the retirement system.

This subsection shall apply only to an officer or employee of the authority holding office or employed on July 1, 1994.

An officer or employee of the authority who is subject to the provisions of this subsection shall, upon furnishing proof of prior employment to the board of trustees, be eligible to receive creditable service under this retirement system for prior employment as an officer or employee of the authority, subject to the requirements of this subsection. Any such officer or employee must pay to the board of trustees the employee contributions which would have been paid during the period of prior employment if the officer or employee had been a member of the retirement system during such period. The authority shall be authorized to pay from any funds available to the authority the employer contributions which would have been paid during such period of prior employment. For a member claiming creditable service for prior employment under this subsection, the board of trustees shall determine the period of time that the payments to the board of trustees provided for under this subsection will fund as creditable service under the retirement system without creating any additional accrued liability of the retirement system. Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, the amount of creditable service so determined shall be the creditable service to which the member is entitled.

The authority shall be authorized to supplement, if necessary, the payments made to the board of trustees under paragraph (2) of this subsection in an amount, as determined by the board of trustees, which will fully fund as creditable service the total amount of prior employment of the officer or employee without creating any additional accrued liability of the retirement system. If such supplement is paid to the board of trustees by the authority, the officer or employee shall receive full creditable service under the retirement system for all prior employment as an officer or employee of the authority.

An officer or employee of the authority who is subject to the provisions of this subsection shall have the same membership status under the retirement system which the person had during the person’s previous service as a member of the retirement system. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to limit the right of an officer or employee of the authority who is subject to the provisions of this subsection to retain or reestablish creditable service for previous service as a member of the retirement system.

Any officer or employee of the authority who was already a member of the retirement system on July 1, 1994, and any member of the retirement system who, without any break in service, becomes an officer or employee of the authority on or after July 1, 1994, shall continue in the same membership status without any interruption in membership service and without the loss of any creditable service.

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (c) and (d) of this Code section, an officer or employee of the authority becoming a member of the retirement system pursuant to the provisions of this Code section shall be subject to the provisions of Code Section 47-2-334.

All employer contributions, including employee contributions made by the employer on behalf of members, which are required by this chapter shall be made for members who are subject to the provisions of this Code section from funds appropriated to or otherwise available for the operation of the Georgia Music Hall of Fame Authority. The authority shall deduct from the salaries payable to such members the additional employee contributions required by this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-2-322

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 715, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Ga. L. 1994, p. 396, § 1, Ga. L. 1994, p. 715, § 1, and Ga. L. 1994, p. 718, § 1 all enacted a Code Section 47-2-321. Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, the Code sections enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 715, § 1 and Ga. L. 1994, p. 718, § 1 were renumbered as Code Sections 47-2-322 and 47-2-323, respectively.

47-2-323.
Membership in retirement system of employees of Georgia Public Defender Council; creditable service; contributions.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Council” means the Georgia Public Defender Council established by Code Section 17-12-3.

“Employee” means any full-time employee of the council.

“Proof of prior employment” means pay records, income tax withholding records, or other records of the council which are sufficient to establish to the satisfaction of the board of trustees the prior employment record of an employee of the council.

Effective July 1, 1994, or on the date of employment, each employee of the council shall become a member of the retirement system.

This subsection shall apply only to an employee of the council employed by the council prior to July 1, 1994.

An employee of the council who is subject to the provisions of this subsection shall, upon furnishing proof of prior employment to the board of trustees, be eligible to receive creditable service under this retirement system for prior employment as an employee of the council, subject to the requirements of this subsection. Any such employee must pay to the board of trustees the employee contributions which would have been paid during the period of prior employment if the employee had been a member of the retirement system during such period. The council shall pay from any funds available to the council the employer contributions which would have been paid during such period of prior employment. For a member claiming creditable service for prior employment under this subsection, the board of trustees shall determine the period of time that the payments to the board of trustees provided for under this subsection will fund as creditable service under the retirement system without creating any additional accrued liability of the retirement system. Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, the amount of creditable service so determined shall be the creditable service to which the member is entitled.

The council shall be authorized to supplement, if necessary, the payments made to the board of trustees under paragraph (2) of this subsection in an amount, as determined by the board of trustees, which will fully fund as creditable service the total amount of prior employment of the employee without creating any additional accrued liability of the retirement system. If such supplement is paid to the board of trustees by the council, the employee shall receive full creditable service under the retirement system for all prior employment as an employee of the council.

Any employee of the council who was already a member of the retirement system on July 1, 1994, and any member of the retirement system who, without any break in service, becomes an employee of the council on or after July 1, 1994, shall continue in the same membership status without any interruption in membership service and without the loss of any creditable service.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) of this Code section, an employee of the council becoming a member of the retirement system pursuant to the provisions of this Code section shall be subject to the provisions of Code Section 47-2-334.

All employer contributions, including employee contributions made by the employer on behalf of members, which are required by this chapter shall be made for members who are subject to the provisions of this Code section from funds appropriated to or otherwise available for the operation of the council. The council shall deduct from the salaries payable to such members the additional employee contributions required by this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-2-323

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 718, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 596, § 1; Ga. L. 2015, p. 898, § 2/HB 266.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Georgia Public Defender Council” for “Georgia Public Defender Standards Council” in paragraph (a)(1).

Code Commission notes.

Ga. L. 1994, p. 396, § 1, Ga. L. 1994, p. 715, § 1, and Ga. L. 1994, p. 718, § 1 all enacted a Code Section 47-2-321. Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, the Code sections enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 715, § 1 and Ga. L. 1994, p. 718, § 1 were renumbered as Code Sections 47-2-322 and 47-2-323, respectively.

47-2-324.
Membership in retirement system of officers and employees of the North Georgia Mountains Authority; creditable service; contributions.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“North Georgia Mountains Authority” or “authority” means the North Georgia Mountains Authority established by Part 10 of Article 7 of Chapter 3 of Title 12.

“Officer or employee” means the executive director of the authority and any other full-time employee of the authority employed pursuant to the provisions of paragraph (3) of Code Section 12-3-294.

“Proof of prior employment” means pay records, income tax withholding records, or other records of the authority which are sufficient to establish to the satisfaction of the board of trustees the prior employment record of an officer or employee of the authority.

Effective July 1, 1996, or on the date of employment, each officer or employee of the authority shall become a member of the retirement system.

This subsection shall apply only to an officer or employee of the authority holding office or employed on July 1, 1996.

An officer or employee of the authority who is subject to the provisions of this subsection shall, upon furnishing proof of prior employment to the board of trustees not later than December 31, 1996, or six months after the date of employment, whichever date is later, be eligible to receive creditable service under this retirement system for prior employment as an officer or employee of the authority, subject to the requirements of this subsection. Any such officer or employee must pay to the board of trustees the employee contributions which would have been paid during the period of prior employment if the officer or employee had been a member of the retirement system during such period. The authority shall be authorized to pay from any funds available to the authority the employer contributions which would have been paid during such period of prior employment. For a member claiming creditable service for prior employment under this subsection, the board of trustees shall determine the period of time that the payments to the board of trustees provided for under this subsection will fund as creditable service under the retirement system without creating any additional accrued liability of the retirement system. Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, the amount of creditable service so determined shall be the creditable service to which the member is entitled.

An officer or employee shall have the option to transfer all or a portion of his or her vested interest in the pension plan maintained by the authority prior to July 1, 1996, to satisfy all or a portion of the cost to receive creditable service allowed pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subsection. Any funds transferred pursuant to such option shall be credited to the officer’s or employee’s annuity account established by the retirement system. The authority shall be authorized, but not required, to supplement such amount so transferred. The officer or employee shall receive such creditable service as the combination of funds transferred or paid for or on behalf of the employee would warrant without creating any additional accrued liability of the retirement system, up to the maximum amount of creditable service allowed by paragraph (2) of this subsection.

Any officer or employee of the authority who was already a member of the retirement system on July 1, 1996, and any member of the retirement system who, without any break in service, becomes an officer or employee of the authority on or after July 1, 1994, shall continue in the same membership status without any interruption in membership service and without the loss of any creditable service.

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (c) and (d) of this Code section, an officer or employee of the authority becoming a member of the retirement system pursuant to the provisions of this Code section shall be subject to the provisions of Code Section 47-2-334.

All employer contributions, including employee contributions made by the employer on behalf of members, which are required by this chapter shall be made for members who are subject to the provisions of this Code section from funds appropriated to or otherwise available for the operation of the North Georgia Mountains Authority. The authority shall deduct from the salaries payable to such members the additional employee contributions required by this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-2-324

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 719, § 1.

47-2-325.
[Reserved] Membership in retirement system of prior employees of the Foundation for Public Broadcasting in Georgia, Inc.

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 37, effective July 1, 2010.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was based on Code 1981, §

47-2-325

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 169, § 1.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207 § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-2-326.
Georgia Rail Passenger Authority retirement system; membership; contributions.

As used in this Code section, the term “Georgia Rail Passenger Authority” or “authority” means that authority created by Article 9 of Chapter 9 of Title 46, the “Georgia Rail Passenger Authority Law.”

Effective July 1, 2002, or on the date of employment, whichever date is later, each officer or employee of the authority shall become a member of the retirement system.

Any officer or employee of the authority who was already a member of the retirement system on July 1, 2002, and any member of the retirement system who, without any break in service, becomes an officer or employee of the authority on or after July 1, 2002, shall continue in the same membership status without any interruption in membership service and without the loss of any creditable service.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this Code section, an officer or employee of the authority becoming a member of the retirement system pursuant to the provisions of this Code section shall be subject to the provisions of Code Section 47-2-334.

All employer contributions, including employee contributions made by the employer on behalf of members, which are required by this chapter shall be made for members who are subject to the provisions of this Code section from funds appropriated to or otherwise available for the operation of the Georgia Rail Passenger Authority. The authority shall deduct from the salaries payable to such members the additional employee contributions required by this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-2-326

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 1291, § 1.

47-2-327.
Employees of the State Road and Tollway Authority to become members of the retirement system; status; employer and employee contributions.

As used in this Code section, the term “State Road and Tollway Authority” or “authority” means that authority continued by Article 2 of Chapter 10 of Title 32, relating to the State Road and Tollway Authority.

Effective July 1, 2006, or on the date of employment, whichever date is later, each officer or employee of the authority shall become a member of the retirement system.

Any officer or employee of the authority who was already a member of the retirement system on July 1, 2006, and any member of the retirement system who, without any break in service, becomes an officer or employee of the authority on or after July 1, 2006, shall continue in the same membership status without any interruption in membership service and without the loss of any creditable service.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this Code section, an officer or employee of the authority becoming a member of the retirement system pursuant to the provisions of this Code section shall be subject to the provisions of Code Section 47-2-334.

All employer contributions, including employee contributions made by the employer on behalf of members, which are required by this chapter shall be made for members who are subject to the provisions of this Code section from funds appropriated to or otherwise available for the operation of the State Road and Tollway Authority. The authority shall deduct from the salaries payable to such members the additional employee contributions required by this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-2-327

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 174, § 1/SB 177.